Massachusetts, session 194th, S2274.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 2RRRRR.
(a) As appearing in the following section the following word shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meaning:
“Veterans’ organization”, any veterans' organization incorporated by the Congress of the
United States.
(b) There is hereby established and set up on the books of the commonwealth an
expendable trust to be known as the Veterans' Organization Posts solar program. The secretary of
of 2

energy and environmental affairs shall establish a grant program to provide solar energy
technology to Veterans organizations, that any such grant shall be expended for solar energy
technology at the local Veterans' organization's headquarters location, hall, or post; provided
further, that 100 per cent of the solar energy produced by said technology will benefit the
awarded local Veterans organization. The amounts credited to the trust shall be available for
expenditure, subject to appropriation, not to exceed $500,000 in a fiscal year, for the costs
associated with purchasing and installing solar energy generating equipment for Veterans
organizations that meet criteria set forth by the secretary; provided, that not less than 10 grants
shall be awarded per fiscal year; provided further, that no grant amount shall exceed $50,000;
and provided further, that grants shall be awarded in geographically diverse areas of the
commonwealth.
(c) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall annually submit a
report on disbursements of the trust, including, but not limited to, grant awardees and amounts
awarded, to the clerks of the house and senate and the joint committee on telecommunications,
utilities and energy not later than December 31.
of 2